Massachusetts, session 194th, H1561.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 124 of Chapter 164 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the
word "relates" the following new paragraph:
When a tenant is the customer of record, a gas or electric company must provide notice of
delinquent charges to the owner of a rental dwelling unit if the owner notifies the gas or electric
company in writing that a property served by the gas or electric company is a residential rental
property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete
and accurate mailing address. The gas or electric company shall serve notice of the delinquent
charges to the owner of the rental dwelling unit within 14 days of the date on which the tenant's
charges became past due. If the tenant seeks to terminate a service agreement at the rental
dwelling unit or in the absence of a duly constituted customer of record, a gas or electric
of 2

company must provide notice of the proposed termination of service to the owner of a rental
dwelling unit if the owner notifies the gas or electric company in writing that a property served
by the gas or electric company is a residential rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's
delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address. The gas or
electric company shall serve notice of the proposed termination or absence of a duly constituted
customer of record to the owner of the rental dwelling unit 14 days prior to any scheduled
termination of service.
of 2